Illinois, session 104th, SB3827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Article XLVIII as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)7ARTICLE XLVIII. RATES FOR FIRE AND EXTENDED COVERAGE INSURANCE 8    (215 ILCS 5/1802 new)9    Sec. 1802. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to:10        (1) Protect policyholders and the public against 11    excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory rates.12        (2) Promote price competition among insurers to 13    provide rates that are responsive to competitive market 14    conditions.15        (3) Provide regulatory controls in the absence of 16    competition.17        (4) Maintain availability and reliability of 18    insurance.19        (5) Promote the dissemination of price and other 20    information to enable consumers to purchase insurance 21    suitable for their needs and to foster competitive 22    insurance markets.   SB3827- 2 -LRB104 20373 BAB 33828 b1    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)2    Sec. 1805. Applicability. This Article applies to policies 3of fire and extended coverage insurance, as defined in 4subsection (b) of Section 143.13 of this Code, to which 5Section 143.11 of this Code applies. This Article does not 6apply to the following:7        (1) policies for any commercial liability and property 8    insurance;9        (2) policies for a structure, all or part of which is 10    leased or rented, regardless of whether the insured 11    occupied all or part of the structure as a primary 12    residence;13        (3) policies for a structure that is unoccupied and 14    intended by the insured to be sold, leased, or rented or 15    policies for a structure that is unoccupied and under 16    active construction, renovation, or substantial 17    improvement and that is intended by the insured to be 18    sold, leased, or rented; and19        (4) policies for a home or dwelling that is part of a 20    farm policy, regardless of whether the insured owned the 21    dwelling or occupied the dwelling as a primary residence. 22    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)23    Sec. 1810. Rate standards. Rates shall not be excessive, 24inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory.  SB3827- 3 -LRB104 20373 BAB 33828 b1        (1) Excessive rates.2            (A) A rate in a competitive market is not 3        excessive.4            (B) A rate in a noncompetitive market is excessive 5        if it is likely to produce a profit that is 6        unreasonably high for the insurance provided.7        (2) Inadequate rates. A premium level is inadequate if 8    it endangers the solvency of the insurer.9        (3) Unfairly discriminatory rates. Unfairly 10    discriminatory rates exist if, after allowing for 11    practical limitation, the price differentials fail to 12    reflect the difference in expected losses and expenses. A 13    rate is not unfairly discriminatory if different premiums 14    result for policyholders with similar loss exposures but 15    different expenses, or similar expenses but different loss 16    exposures, so long as the rate reflects the differences 17    with reasonable accuracy.18        (4) A rate is reasonable and not excessive, 19    inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory if it is an 20    actuarially sound estimate of the expected value of all 21    future costs associated with an individual risk transfer. 22    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)23    Sec. 1815. Filings of rates and other rating information. 24    (a) Each insurer shall file with the Director all rates 25and supplementary rate information for risks that are to be   SB3827- 4 -LRB104 20373 BAB 33828 b1written in this State 20 days prior to the effective date of 2the rates.3    (b) In a competitive market, unless disapproved by the 4Director, a filing meets the requirements of this Article and 5becomes effective 20 days after its submission to the Director 6or sooner if approved by the Director.7    (c) In a noncompetitive market as determined under 8subsection (b) of Section 1820, unless disapproved by the 9Director, a filing meets the requirements of this Article and 10becomes effective 60 days after its submission to the Director 11or sooner if approved by the Director. 12    (d) Insurers must adhere to filings made under this 13Section until the filings are amended or withdrawn. 14    (215 ILCS 5/1820 new)15    Sec. 1820. Monitoring competition; determining competitive 16markets; hearing. 17    (a) The Director shall monitor competition and the 18availability of insurance for the policies of insurance to 19which this Article applies.20    (b) A noncompetitive market shall only exist wherein, over 21a 3-year period, the Herfindahl/Hirschman Index (HII) 22consistently remains at 1800 or above, as determined through 23the annual cost containment report required under Section 1200 24of this Code.25    (c) A competitive market is presumed to exist for a line of   SB3827- 5 -LRB104 20373 BAB 33828 b1insurance unless the Director, after a hearing, issues an 2order stating that a reasonable degree of competition does not 3exist in the market. The burden of proof in any hearing shall 4be placed on the party or parties advocating the position that 5competition does not exist. Any ruling that a market is not 6competitive shall identify the factors causing the market not 7to be competitive. Such order shall expire no later than one 8year after issue unless rescinded earlier by the Director or 9unless the Director renews the rule after a hearing and a 10finding as to the continued lack of a reasonable degree of 11competition. Any ruling that renews the finding that 12competition does not exist shall also identify the factors 13that cause the market to continue not to be competitive.14    (d)(1) In determining whether a reasonable degree of 15competition exists within a line of insurance, the Director 16shall consider at least the following factors:17        (A) the number of insurers actively engaged in writing 18    coverage;19        (B) market shares of the leading writers and the 20    changes in market shares over a reasonable period of time;21        (C) the existence of financial or economic barriers 22    that could prevent new firms from entering the market;23        (D) measures of market concentration and changes of 24    market concentration over time;25        (E) whether long-term profitability for insurers in 26    the market is reasonable in relation to industries of   SB3827- 6 -LRB104 20373 BAB 33828 b1    comparable business risk; and2        (F) the relationship of insurers' costs to revenue 3    over a reasonable period of time.4    (2) All determinations by the Director shall be made on 5the basis of findings of fact and conclusions of law.6    (3) The ruling of the Director under this Section is 7subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 8Law.9    (e) The Director shall maintain by year whether the market 10is competitive as of December 31 of each year. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 121, 2028.